Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 5 Construction of Port Facilities

46-5-1.
Power to acquire land along tidewater.

The department of environmental management is authorized to acquire in fee simple from the state as authorized in §

46-5-1.1

or in the name of the state for the use and benefit of the public, by purchase or condemnation or by lease from time to time, any portion of real property, tide-flowed lands, plats, terms, easements, privileges, foreshore, riparian, and littoral rights of the owner or owners of them, bordering on tidewater in the state and as much of the uplands adjacent to the tide lands as the director of the department of environmental management deems expedient.

History of Section.

P.L. 1910, ch. 568, § 4; P.L. 1910, ch. 643, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 149, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 112, § 27; P.L. 1945, ch. 1650, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

46-5-1

; P.L. 2000, ch. 314, § 1.

46-5-1.1.
Permission to conduct filling activity distinguished from grants of rights and property interest in the filled area.

It is the policy of the state of Rhode Island that the state’s permission to fill tidelands is separate and distinct from the state’s granting of a right, title, or interest in and to the resulting filled area. Furthermore, it is the policy of the state of Rhode Island that the state permission to use tidal lands is separate and distinct from the state’s conveyance of its fee title estate, or any real estate interest, in the tidal lands. Any title to a free hold estate may be conveyed only by a valid legislative grant for public trust purposes by direct enactment of the general assembly as specified in this chapter. Moreover, any leasehold interest or license to use those lands may only arise under the authority of the general assembly whether exercised by the general assembly itself or exercised pursuant to a valid delegation to a duly authorized instrumentality of the state. Any state permission to use tidal lands belonging to the state shall be deemed to create only a revocable license interest unless a greater interest is clearly intended by the permission and the requirements of this chapter for the creation of that greater interest are met.

It is intended that there shall be no acquiring of any right or title whatsoever to these public lands by adverse possession or by a acquiescence of the sovereign. It is further intended that there shall be no acquiring of any right or title to any freehold estate to these public lands by any permit or approval to conduct fill activity, however denominated or manifested, or by any other means, including through the leasing and licensing of these public lands, except solely by grant and enactment of the general assembly as provided in this chapter for a use that benefits the public under the public trust doctrine. Without impairing any right, title, or interest that may have previously vested, any placement of fill to a harbor line or other filling of tidal lands, which has not been commenced and completed as of the date of the enactment of this section [July 18, 2000], shall not be effective as conveying the state’s title nor as a limitation on the public trust.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit, impair, increase, or add to the ownership rights or title in any filled lands which vested prior to the enactment of this section [July 18, 2000].

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 314, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 39.

46-5-1.2.
State ownership of tidal lands — Grants of title by the General Assembly — Approval to fill required — General Assembly to set policy — Harborlines repealed.

The state of Rhode Island, pursuant to the public trust doctrine long recognized in federal and Rhode Island state case law, and to Article 1, § 17 of the Constitution of Rhode Island as originally adopted and as subsequently amended, has historically maintained title in fee simple to all soil within its boundaries that lies below the high water mark and to any land resulting from any filling of any tidal area, except those portions of tidal lands or filled tidal lands in respect to which the state has formally granted title in fee simple to private individuals or to which title has been otherwise acquired by private individuals by judicially recognized mechanisms prior to the effective date of this section [July 18, 2000]. Subsequent to the effective date of this section [July 18, 2000], no title to any freehold estate in any tidal land or filled land can be acquired by any private individual unless it is formally conveyed by explicit grant of the state by the general assembly for public trust purposes.

Subsequent to the effective date of this section [July 18, 2000], no lease of any tidal land or filled land, and no license to use any of that land, can be acquired by any private individual or entity unless the lease or license has been specifically approved for public trust purposes by the general assembly itself or under the specific authority of the general assembly such as, but not limited to, the delegation of authority under chapter 23 of this title.

No filling or dredging operation commenced or continued subsequent to the effective date of this section [July 18, 2000] on tidal lands, whether or not title to the tidal land is held by the state pursuant to this section, may be conducted unless the individual or entity conducting the operation obtains and satisfies all appropriate and applicable regulatory authorizations and approvals. Therefore, nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit or impair the authority of the state, or any duly established agency of the state, to regulate filling or dredging affecting tidal lands.

The general assembly, by its enactments, establishes the policies for the preservation and, in particular, for the use of natural resources of the state which are held in public trust by the state, as provided in Article 1, § 17 of the Rhode Island Constitution and in this chapter. The general assembly has the responsibility and the sole authority to arrive at, and define, by its enactment, a policy balance between or among the competing proposed uses or developments for tidal lands and the respective competing assertions concerning the public interests in those lands, and that determination shall be deemed to be, and be accepted as, the authoritative definition of the public interest in relation to the preservation and use of tidal lands.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to repeal or limit any duly enacted delegation of regulatory or adjudicatory authority to any administrative agency of the state when exercised within statutory authority.

Any prior enactment which creates a harborline is, to that extent, hereby repealed and all harborlines are abolished, except that nothing in this section shall destroy or impair any rights in previously filled land which may have already vested prior to the date of this enactment [July 18, 2000].

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 314, § 2.

46-5-2.
Filing of description, plat, and statement as to land to be condemned.

Whenever the department of environmental management has decided to take by condemnation such land or any estate or interest in land, and the phrase
“such land”
as used in §§

46-5-2

—

46-5-8

shall be deemed to describe and apply to whatever land or estate or interest in land is condemned hereunder, the department of environmental management shall cause to be filed in the records of land evidence of the city or town where such land is situated a description and plat of such land and also a statement that such land is taken pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, which description, plat, and statement shall be signed by the director of the department of environmental management.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 112, § 27; P.L. 1945, ch. 1650, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

46-5-2

.

46-5-3.
Vesting of title to land taken.

Upon the filing of the description, plat, and statement, the title to and immediate right of possession of such land shall vest in the state of Rhode Island in fee simple unless a lesser estate or interest therein is specified in the statement as taken by the department of environmental management, in which last case, title to and right of possession of such land shall vest in the state to the extent and according to the nature of the title therein taken.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 112, § 27; P.L. 1945, ch. 1650, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

46-5-3

.

46-5-4.
Service and publication of notice of taking of land.

After the filing of the description, plat, and statement, notice of the taking of such land shall be served upon the owner of or persons having an estate and interest in such land by the sheriff or any deputy sheriff for the county in which such land is situated by leaving a true and attested copy of the description and statement with each of the owners or persons personally, or at his or her last usual place of abode in this state with some person living there, and in case any such owner or person is absent from the state and has no last or usual place of abode therein occupied by any person, a copy shall be left with the persons, if any, in charge of or having possession of such land of the absent owner or person, and another copy thereof shall be mailed to the address of the absent owner or person if the address is known to the officer, and after the filing of the description, plat, and statement, the department of environmental management shall cause a copy of the description and statement to be published in some newspaper or newspapers published or having general circulation in the county where such land is located at least once a week for three (3) successive weeks.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 112, § 27; P.L. 1945, ch. 1650, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

46-5-4

.

46-5-5.
Payment of agreed price.

If any party shall agree with the department of environmental management to the price for his or her estate or interest in any such land, that price shall be paid to him or her forthwith out of the funds appropriated and available thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1910, ch. 568, § 4; P.L. 1910, ch. 643, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 149, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 112, § 27; P.L. 1945, ch. 1650, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

46-5-5

.

46-5-6.
Jury assessment of damages — Consolidation of claims for trial.

Any owner or person who cannot agree with the department of environmental management to the price for his or her estate or interest in any such land may, within six (6) months after personal notice of the taking, or if he or she has had no personal notice, within one year from the filing of the description, plat, and statement, apply by petition to the superior court for one of the counties in which the land is located, setting forth the taking of his or her land or his or her estate or interest in such land and praying for an assessment of damages by a jury. Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall cause twenty (20) days’ notice of the pendency thereof to be given to the department of environmental management by serving its director with a certified copy thereof, and, thereafterwards, the cause shall be conducted as other civil actions of law are tried including the right to except rulings, to move for a new trial and prosecute an appeal, and, upon recovery of final judgment therein, execution shall be issued therefor and shall forthwith be paid by the general treasurer out of the funds appropriated and available therefor, but the verdict and the judgment entered thereon shall not include any item of interest for any period during which such land is actually occupied or enjoyed by the owner or owners thereof. In case two (2) or more petitioners make claim to the same land or to any estate or interest therein or to different estates or interests in the same parcel of land, the court shall, upon motion, consolidate their several petitions for trial and frame all necessary issues therefor.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 112, § 27; P.L. 1945, ch. 1650, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

46-5-6

.

46-5-7.
Late filing of petition for jury trial.

The court may, in its discretion, permit the filing of the petition subsequent to one year from the filing of the description, plat, and statement, unless the petitioner therein has had actual notice of the taking of the land in which the petitioner claims an interest in season to have filed his or her petition within the year, and unless the state has then paid some other person for the estate or interest or become liable to pay for the estate or interest under a judgment rendered against the state under the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 112, § 27; P.L. 1945, ch. 1650, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

46-5-7

.

46-5-8.
Representation of infants and incompetents.

If any infant or person not capable by law to act in his or her own behalf by the owner of any estate or interest in any land so taken, the court, upon the filing therein of a petition by or in behalf of the infant or other person, may appoint a guardian ad litem for the infant or other person, and the guardian may appear and be heard in behalf of the infant or other person; and the guardian may also, with the advice and consent of the court, and upon such terms as the court may prescribe, release to the state all claims for damages for and to the estate or interest in the land. Any lawfully appointed, qualified, and acting guardian of the estate of any infant or other person, with the approval of the court of probate within this state having jurisdiction to authorize the sale of land within this state of the infant or other person, may, before the filing of the petition, agree with the department of environmental management upon the amount of damages suffered by the infant or other person by any taking hereunder of his or her land or any estate or interest in his or her land, and may, upon receiving that amount, release to the state all claims of damages of the infant or the other person for the taking.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 112, § 27; P.L. 1945, ch. 1650, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

46-5-8

.

46-5-9.
Construction of port facilities — Rates for services.

The director of the department of environmental management may, after the acquirement by the state of any property, tide-flowed lands, flats, terms, easements, privileges, littoral, and riparian rights of any owner or owners, either by purchase or by process of law, proceed to fill, improve, reclaim, and use any or all of the lands, may build and construct wharves, piers, bulkheads, slips, docks, and basins, and dredge, improve, and deepen the channels and approaches thereto, and for these purposes may request the division of purchases to make contracts for the filling and improvement of the property and lands and for the construction of the wharves, piers, bulkheads, slips, docks, and basins, and may, from time to time, employ such persons as may be necessary in the work of filling and improving the property and land, and the construction, repair, and maintenance of the improvements and structure thereof, and when any wharves, piers, bulkheads, slips, docks, and basins shall have been completed by the director under the provisions of this chapter and shall be open to the public use, the director may establish, publish, and regulate the rates and charges for the wharfage, cranage, and dockage of all vessels admitted thereto, and may alter such rates and charges from time to time as the necessities of trade shall require and authorize, and as to the director may seem proper.

History of Section.

P.L. 1910, ch. 568, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 149, § 29; G.L. 1938, ch. 112, § 28; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-5-9

.

46-5-10.
Lease of facilities.

The director may from time to time, in the name of the state of Rhode Island, lease any property, whether improved or unimproved, acquired by purchase or by the process of law, and storage facilities, wharves, piers, bulkheads, docks, sheds, warehouses, and industrial locations within the director’s charge, for such term or terms not exceeding twenty (20) years, except for the port of Galilee, in which property may be leased for a term of up to forty (40) years and for any rent and with such provisions and covenants as to the director shall seem to be advantageous to the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1910, ch. 568, § 8; P.L. 1912, ch. 810, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 149, § 30; G.L. 1938, ch. 112, § 29; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-5-10

; P.L. 1979, ch. 251, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 39, § 1.

46-5-11.
Control and management of public facilities.

The director shall retain under his or her own control and management and in his or her own possession, for use by the public for the transient needs and purposes of such vessels as shall from time to time come to the port of Providence, a portion of the property, wharves, piers, and docks sufficient for the transient needs and purposes of the vessels so coming to the port of Providence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1910, ch. 568, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 149, § 31; G.L. 1938, ch. 112, § 30; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-5-11

.

46-5-12.
Rules and regulations — Penalty for violation.

The director shall establish and enforce such proper rules and regulations for the government and proper care of all the property acquired under this chapter, whether improved or unimproved, as the director shall deem best, and shall furnish a copy of the rules and regulations to all persons using or occupying the land, property, or any portion thereof, and shall make all needful orders necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, and shall fix penalties for disobeying the rules, regulations, or orders, and shall also file in his or her office a copy of all rules, regulations, and orders adopted by the director.

Any person who shall violate any rule, regulation, or order of the department, a copy thereof shall have been theretofore filed in the office of the director of the department of environmental management, shall, upon conviction thereof, be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), or imprisoned not exceeding thirty (30) days, or both, in the discretion of the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1910, ch. 568, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 149, § 32; G.L. 1938, ch. 112, § 31; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-5-12

; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 39.

46-5-13.
Disposition of revenues.

All moneys paid for the wharfage, cranage, or dockage of vessels, all rents and other moneys paid to the state, from whatever source, on account of the use of any of the property, improved or unimproved, acquired in the name of and on behalf of the state by the department, shall be paid to the general treasurer by the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1910, ch. 568, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 149, § 33; G.L. 1938, ch. 112, § 32; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-5-13

.

46-5-14.
Operation of facilities for public use.

When any of the wharves, piers, bulkheads, slips, docks, basins, and other property, or any part thereof built, constructed, improved, or acquired by the department, shall have been completed and shall be ready for use, the director may, in his or her discretion, open the wharves, piers, bulkheads, slips, docks, basins, and other property, or any part thereof, to public use, and the director may employ such engineers, assistants, agents, clerks, and other persons as the director may deem necessary for the care, management, and maintenance of the wharves, piers, bulkheads, slips, docks, basins, and other property, and for the promotion and development of the public use thereof, and the general assembly shall annually appropriate such sum as it may deem necessary for the purposes enumerated in this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1910, ch. 568, § 12; P.L. 1915, ch. 1223, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 149, § 34; P.L. 1925, ch. 574, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 112, § 33; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-5-14

.

46-5-15.
Disposition of lands no longer needed.

The director of the department of environmental management, when he or she shall deem any land or interests in land acquired or taken under the provisions of this chapter to be no longer required for the purposes of this chapter, may:

With the consent of the person or persons from whom the land or interests were obtained, or their heirs, successors, or assigns, convey the land or any part thereof with or without suitable restrictions by executing and recording a deed thereof, which deed shall be duly executed on behalf of the state by the director of the department of environmental management, and the recorded deed shall thereby revest the title to the land or interests in land so conveyed in the persons, their heirs, successors, and assigns, in whom it was vested at the time of the taking, and the fair market value of the land or interests in land so conveyed at the time of the conveyance may be pleaded in mitigation of damages in any proceedings instituted on account of the taking; or

Lease or sell and convey the land with or without suitable restrictions for such consideration as may be fixed by the director of the department of environmental management, by executing and delivering a lease or deed thereof, which lease or deed shall be executed on behalf of the state by the director; provided, however, the person or persons in whom the title to the land was vested at the time the land was acquired under the provisions of this chapter, shall, if living, and if the land was so acquired within the preceding five (5) years, have the prior right to lease, purchase, or reinvest himself or herself or themselves, as the case may be, of the land before the land may be leased, sold, or conveyed as provided by this section. The prior right shall be conclusively presumed to have been waived in the event that a written offer to lease, sell, or reconvey the land, containing the terms and conditions of the offer, shall have been sent by registered or certified mail to the last known address of the person or persons, and the offer shall not have been accepted within thirty (30) days from the date of the mailing.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 112, § 36; P.L. 1949, ch. 2385, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3717, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

46-5-15

.

46-5-16.
Yacht and boat moorings.

The director of the department of environmental management shall expend such funds as are annually appropriated in purchasing, installing, and maintaining yacht and boat moorings in such harbors in Rhode Island waters as he or she may deem advisable and suitable.

The sum of five hundred dollars ($500) is hereby annually appropriated, out of any money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated, for the maintenance of such yacht and boat moorings as the director of the department of environmental management may have installed in the harbors of Narragansett Bay; and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of such sum, or so much thereof, as may be required from time to time, upon the receipt by him or her of vouchers approved by the director of the department of environmental management. The moorings shall be available to the public without charge and particularly for the use of nonresident visiting yachtspersons; provided, however, that the moorings shall not be used for more than twelve (12) hours continuously; and provided, further, however, that the moorings shall not be used by any commercial or private persons engaging in fishing.

Any person violating any of the provisions of the preceding sentence shall, upon conviction, be fined twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2343, §§ 1-4; impl. am. P.L. 1954, ch. 3358, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

46-5-16

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 103, § 2.